src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_celkkid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - celkkiđ: # MLO, checked, all from 2SYLL_ID
    celkkiđ+V+Inf: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciälhám
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ciälháh
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciälkká
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: celkkeen
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: celkkivettee
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: celkkiv
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: celkkip
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: celkkivetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ceelhij
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: celhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: celhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: celhijn
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ceelhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ceelhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: celkkii
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ciälháččim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ciälháččih
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ciälháččij
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: ciälháččáim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: ciälháččáid
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: ciälháččáin
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: ciälháččijm
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ciälháččijd
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ciälháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: celheem
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: celheeh
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ceelhiš
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: celhižeen
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: ceelhišvettee
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: celhižává
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: celhižep
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ceelhišvetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: celhižeh
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ciälhus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ciälkkoon
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ciälkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ciälkkup
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ciälkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ciälkkám
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: ciälháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ciälháá
    celkkiđ+V+PrsPrc: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+PrfPrc: ciälkkám
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Nom: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ess: celkkimin
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Loc: celkkimist
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ill: celkkimân
    celkkiđ+V+Ger: celhidijn
    celkkiđ+V+VAbess: celhihánnáá
    
     
  Verb - kieldiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    kieldiđ+V+Inf: kieldiđ
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldám
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäldá
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kieldih
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kieldim
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kieldij
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kieldi
    kieldiđ+V+PrfPrc: kiäldám
     
     
  Verb - kevttiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    kevttiđ+V+Inf: kevttiđ
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiävtám
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiävttá # not in corpus
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kevttih
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kevttim
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keevtij #corp 
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: keevti
    kevttiđ+V+PrfPrc: kiävttám
     
  Verb - mäksiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    mäksiđ+V+Inf: mäksiđ
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máávsám
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máksá
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mäksih
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: maksim
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: maavsij
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: määvsi
    mäksiđ+V+PrfPrc: máksám
     
  Verb - väzziđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    väzziđ+V+Inf: väzziđ
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váázám
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vázzá
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: väzzih
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vazzim
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vaazij
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vääzi
    väzziđ+V+PrfPrc: vázzám
     
  Verb - ráhtiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    rähtiđ+V+Inf: rähtiđ
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rááhtám
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ráhtá
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rähtih
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rahtim
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: raahtij
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: räähti
    rähtiđ+V+PrfPrc: ráhtám

  Verb - juátkiđ: #forms found in corpus
    juátkiđ+V+Inf: juátkiđ 
    juátkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: jotkii
